Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 1. Hospital and Nursing Home Licensure and Inspection.
§ 32.1-127.1:04.
Use or disclosure of certain protected health information required.

The coordination of prevention and control of disease, injury, or disability and the delivery of health care benefits are hereby declared to be (i) necessary public health activities; (ii) necessary health oversight activities for the integrity of the health care system; and (iii) necessary to prevent serious harm and serious threats to the health and safety of individuals and the public.

The Departments of Health, Medical Assistance Services, Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, and Social Services, and the Departments for Aging and Rehabilitative Services, the Blind and Vision Impaired, and the Deaf and Hard-of-Hearing, or any successors in interest thereof shall establish a secure system for sharing protected health information that may be necessary for the coordination of prevention and control of disease, injury, or disability and for the delivery of health care benefits when such protected information concerns individuals who (i) have contracted a reportable disease, including exposure to a toxic substance, as required by the Board of Health pursuant to §

32.1-35

or other disease or disability required to be reported by law; (ii) are the subjects of public health surveillance, public health investigations, or public health interventions or are applicants for or recipients of medical assistance services; (iii) have been or are the victims of child abuse or neglect or domestic violence; or (iv) may present a serious threat to health or safety of a person or the public or may be subject to a serious threat to their health or safety. For the purposes of this section, “public health interventions” shall include the services provided through the Departments for Aging and Rehabilitative Services, the Blind and Vision Impaired, and the Deaf and Hard-of-Hearing, or any successors in interest thereof.Pursuant to the regulations concerning patient privacy promulgated by the federal Department of Health and Human Services, covered entities may disclose protected health information to the secure system without obtaining consent or authorization for such disclosure. Such protected health information shall be used exclusively for the purposes established in this section.

The Office of the Attorney General shall advise the Departments of Health, Medical Assistance Services, Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, and Social Services and the Departments for Aging and Rehabilitative Services, the Blind and Vision Impaired, and the Deaf and Hard-of-Hearing, or any successors in interest thereof, in the implementation of this section.

History.

2002, c. 835; 2003, c. 464; 2009, cc. 813, 840; 2012, cc. 803, 835.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 464, in subsection B, in the first sentence, inserted “Rehabilitative Services,” and “and the Departments for the Aging, the Blind and Vision Impaired, and the Deaf and Hard-of-Hearing, or any successors in interest thereof”; added the last sentence of subsection B; and rewrote subsection C, which formerly read: “The Office of the Attorney General shall advise the Departments of Health, Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services, Medical Assistance Services, and Social Services in the implementation of this section.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and substituted “Behavioral Health and Developmental” for “Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse” near the beginning of subsections B and C.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 59, are identical, and in subsection B, in the first sentence, deleted “Rehabilitative Services” preceding “and Social Services” and substituted “Departments for Aging and Rehabilitative Services” for “Departments for the Aging” and in the last sentence, substituted “Departments for Aging and Rehabilitative Services” for “Department of Rehabilitative Services, and the Department for the Aging”; and in subsection C, deleted “Rehabilitative Services” preceding “and Social Services” and substituted “Departments for Aging and Rehabilitative Services” for “Departments for the Aging.”

§ 32.1-127.1:05.
Breach of medical information notification.

As used in this section:“Breach of the security of the system” means unauthorized access and acquisition of unencrypted and unredacted computerized data that compromises the security, confidentiality, or integrity of medical information maintained by an entity. Good faith acquisition of medical information by an employee or agent of an entity for the purposes of the entity is not a breach of the security of the system, provided that the medical information is not used for a purpose other than a lawful purpose of the entity or subject to further unauthorized disclosure.“Encrypted” means the transformation of data through the use of an algorithmic process into a form in which there is a low probability of assigning meaning without the use of a confidential process or key, or the securing of the information by another method that renders the data elements unreadable or unusable.“Entity” means any authority, board, bureau, commission, district or agency of the Commonwealth or of any political subdivision of the Commonwealth, including cities, towns and counties, municipal councils, governing bodies of counties, school boards and planning commissions; boards of visitors of public institutions of higher education; and other organizations, corporations, or agencies in the Commonwealth supported wholly or principally by public funds.“Medical information” means the first name or first initial and last name in combination with and linked to any one or more of the following data elements that relate to a resident of the Commonwealth, when the data elements are neither encrypted nor redacted:

Any information regarding an individual’s medical or mental health history, mental or physical condition, or medical treatment or diagnosis by a health care professional; or

An individual’s health insurance policy number or subscriber identification number, any unique identifier used by a health insurer to identify the individual, or any information in an individual’s application and claims history, including any appeals records.The term does not include information that is lawfully obtained from publicly available information, or from federal, state, or local government records lawfully made available to the general public.“Notice” means:

1.

Written notice to the last known postal address in the records of the entity;

2.

Telephone notice;

Electronic notice; or

Substitute notice, if the entity required to provide notice demonstrates that the cost of providing notice will exceed $50,000, the affected class of Virginia residents to be notified exceeds 100,000 residents, or the entity does not have sufficient contact information or consent to provide notice as described in subdivisions 1, 2, or 3 of this definition. Substitute notice consists of the following:

E-mail notice if the entity has e-mail addresses for the members of the affected class of residents;

Conspicuous posting of the notice on the website of the entity if the entity maintains a website; and

Notice to major statewide media.Notice required by this section shall include a description of the following:

The incident in general terms;

The type of medical information that was subject to the unauthorized access and acquisition;

The general acts of the entity to protect the personal information from further unauthorized access; and

A telephone number that the person may call for further information and assistance, if one exists.“Redact” means alteration or truncation of data such that no information regarding an individual’s medical history, mental or physical condition, or medical treatment or diagnosis or no more than four digits of a health insurance policy number, subscriber number, or other unique identifier are accessible as part of the medical information.

If unencrypted or unredacted medical information was or is reasonably believed to have been accessed and acquired by an unauthorized person, an entity that owns or licenses computerized data that includes medical information shall disclose any breach of the security of the system following discovery or notification of the breach of the security of the system to the Office of the Attorney General, the Commissioner of Health, the subject of the medical information, and any affected resident of the Commonwealth without unreasonable delay. Notice required by this section may be reasonably delayed to allow the entity to determine the scope of the breach of the security of the system and restore the reasonable integrity of the system. Notice required by this section may be delayed if, after the entity notifies a law-enforcement agency, the law-enforcement agency determines and advises the entity that the notice will impede a criminal or civil investigation, or homeland or national security. Notice shall be made without unreasonable delay after the law-enforcement agency determines that the notification will no longer impede the investigation or jeopardize national or homeland security.

An entity shall disclose the breach of the security of the system if encrypted information is accessed and acquired in an unencrypted form, or if the security breach involves a person with access to the encryption key.

An entity that maintains computerized data that includes medical information that the entity does not own or license shall notify the owner or licensee of the information of any breach of the security of the system without unreasonable delay following discovery of the breach of the security of the system, if the medical information was accessed and acquired by an unauthorized person or the entity reasonably believes the medical information was accessed and acquired by an unauthorized person.

In the event an entity provides notice to more than 1,000 persons at one time, pursuant to this section, the entity shall notify, without unreasonable delay, the Office of the Attorney General and the Commissioner of Health of the timing, distribution, and content of the notice.

This section shall not apply to (i) a person or entity who is a “covered entity” or “business associate” under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (42 USC § 1320d et seq.) and is subject to requirements for notification in the case of a breach of protected health information (42 USC 17932 et seq.) or (ii) a person or entity who is a non-HIPAA-covered entity subject to the Health Breach Notification Rule promulgated by the Federal Trade Commission pursuant to 42 USC § 17937 et seq.

An entity that complies with the notification requirements or procedures pursuant to the rules, regulations, procedures, and guidelines established by the entity’s primary or functional state or federal regulator shall be in compliance with this section.

History.

2010, c. 852.

Cross references.

As to protection of students’ personally identifiable information, see § 22.1-287.02.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2010, c. 852, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2011.”

§ 32.1-127.2.
Repealed by Acts 1991, c. 94.

§ 32.1-127.3.
Immunity from liability for certain free health care services.

No hospital employee who renders health care services at his place of employment and within the limits of his licensure, certification, or multistate licensure privilege to practice nursing, or, if such employee is not required to be licensed or certified pursuant to Title 54.1, within the scope of his employment, shall be liable for any civil damages for any act or omission resulting from the rendering of such services to a patient of a clinic which is organized in whole or in part for the delivery of health care services without charge unless such act or omission was the result of gross negligence or willful misconduct. Such clinic shall have on record written agreements with each hospital providing such services, and immunity shall apply only to those services provided by the hospital without charge.

For the purposes of Article 5 (§

2.2-1832

et seq.) of Chapter 18 of Title 2.2, any personnel employed by a hospital licensed pursuant to this article and rendering health care services pursuant to subsection A shall be deemed an agent of the Commonwealth and to be acting in an authorized governmental capacity with respect to delivery of such health care services if (i) the hospital has agreed in writing to provide health care services at no charge for patients referred by a clinic organized in whole or in part for the delivery of health care services without charge, (ii) the employing hospital is registered with the Division of Risk Management, and (iii) the employee delivering such services has no legal or financial interest in the clinic from which the patient is referred. The premium for coverage of such hospital employees under the Risk Management Plan shall be paid by the Department of Health.

The provisions of this section shall only apply to health care personnel providing care pursuant to subsections A and B during the period in which such care is rendered.

Moreover, no officer, director or employee of any such clinic, or the clinic itself, as described in subsection A shall, in the absence of gross negligence or willful misconduct, be liable for civil damages resulting from any act or omission relating to the providing of health care services without charge to patients of the clinic.

For the purposes of this section and Article 5 (§

2.2-1832

et seq.) of Chapter 18 of Title 2.2, “delivery of health care services without charge” shall be deemed to include the delivery of dental or medical services in a dental or medical clinic when a reasonable minimum fee is charged to cover administrative costs.

History.

1993, c. 785; 1994, c. 444; 1996, c. 748; 2000, cc. 618, 632; 2004, c. 49.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 618 and 632 are identical, and substituted “Article 2.2 (§ 2.1-191.5 et seq.) of Chapter 14” for “Article 5.1 (§ 2.1-526.1 et seq.) of Chapter 32” in subsections B and E.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 49, in subsection A, in the first sentence, deleted “or” following “licensure” and inserted “or multistate licensure privilege to practice nursing.”

§ 32.1-128.
Applicability to hospitals and nursing homes for practice of religious tenets.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to authorize or require the interference with or prevention of the establishment or operation of a hospital or nursing home for the practice of religious tenets of any recognized church or denomination in the ministration to the sick and suffering by mental or spiritual means without the use of any drug or material remedy, whether gratuitously or for compensation, provided the statutes and regulations on environmental protection and life safety are complied with.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-301; 1972, c. 36; 1979, c. 711.

§ 32.1-129.
Application for license.

Each application for a hospital or nursing home license shall be made on a form prescribed by the Board. The application shall specify the official name and the kind of hospital or nursing home, the location thereof, the name of the person in charge and such additional relevant information as the Board requires.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-303; 1972, c. 824; 1979, c. 711.

§ 32.1-130.
Service charges.

A service charge of $1.50 per patient bed for which the hospital or nursing home is licensed, but not less than $75 nor more than $500, shall be paid for each license upon issuance and renewal. The service charge for a license for a hospital or nursing home which does not provide overnight inpatient care shall be $75.

All service charges received under the provisions of this article shall be paid into a special fund of the Department and are appropriated to the Department for the operation of the hospital and nursing home licensure and inspection program.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-304; 1979, c. 711.

§ 32.1-131.
Expiration and renewal of licenses.

All licenses shall expire at midnight December 31 of the year issued, or as otherwise specified, and shall be required to be renewed annually.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-304; 1979, c. 711.

§ 32.1-132.
Alterations or additions to hospitals and nursing homes; when new license required; use of inpatient hospital beds for furnishing skilled care services.

Any person who desires to make any substantial alteration or addition to or any material change in any hospital or nursing home shall, before making such change, alteration or addition, submit the proposal therefor to the Commissioner for his approval. The Commissioner shall review the proposal to determine compliance with applicable statutes and regulations of the Board and as soon thereafter as reasonably practicable notify the person that the proposal is or is not approved.

If any such alteration, addition or change has the effect of changing the bed capacity or classification of the hospital or nursing home, the licensee shall obtain a new license for the remainder of the license year before beginning operation of additional beds or in the new classification.

Notwithstanding any provision of state law to the contrary, any hospital, after sending such written notice as may be required by the Commissioner, may utilize, for a period not to exceed thirty days for any one patient, a maximum of ten percent of its inpatient hospital beds as swing beds for the furnishing of services of the type which, if furnished by a nursing home or certified nursing facility, would constitute skilled care services without complying with nursing home licensure requirements or retaining the services of a licensed nursing home administrator. Such hospital shall amend its plan of care and implement its plan as amended to ensure the overall well-being of patients occupying such beds. Only those hospitals which qualify under § 1883 of Title XVIII and § 1913 of Title XIX of the Social Security Act and are certified as skilled nursing facilities may be reimbursed for such services for Medicare and Medicaid patients.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-305; 1979, c. 711; 1983, c. 533; 1989, c. 618.

§ 32.1-133.
Display of license.

The current license shall at all times be posted in each hospital or nursing home in a place readily visible and accessible to the public.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-306; 1979, c. 711.

§ 32.1-133.1.
Human trafficking hotline; posted notice required; civil penalty.

Any health care facility (i) licensed as a hospital pursuant to §

32.1-125

that includes an emergency department or that is a dedicated emergency department as defined in 42 C.F.R. § 489.24(b), (ii) operating as a clinic which is organized in whole or in part for the delivery of health care services without charge, (iii) licensed as an abortion facility pursuant to §

32.1-127

, or (iv) in which the majority of patients are seen without appointments shall post notice of the existence of a human trafficking hotline to alert possible witnesses or victims of human trafficking to the availability of a means to report crimes or gain assistance. The notice required by this section shall be posted in a place readily visible and accessible to the public such as the admitting area or public or patient restrooms of such facility. Such notice shall meet the requirements specified in subsection C of §

40.1-11.3

. The State Board shall promulgate regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this section.

History.

2018, c. 571.

§ 32.1-134.
Family planning information in hospitals providing maternity care.

Every hospital providing maternity care shall, prior to releasing each maternity patient, make available to such patient family planning information and a list of family planning clinics located in the Commonwealth, unless medically contraindicated; provided, however, that any such hospital operated under the auspices of a religious institution objecting to distributing lists of family planning clinics on religious grounds shall not be required to distribute them. Such information and lists may include, but need not be limited to, such information and lists as shall be furnished by the Department.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-154; 1960, c. 248; 1977, c. 680; 1978, c. 162; 1979, c. 711.

§ 32.1-134.01.
Certain information required for maternity patients.

Every licensed nurse midwife, licensed midwife, or hospital providing maternity care shall, prior to releasing each maternity patient, make available to such patient and, if present, to the other parent of the infant and other relevant family members or caretakers, information about the incidence of postpartum blues, perinatal depression, and perinatal anxiety; information to increase awareness of shaken baby syndrome and the dangers of shaking infants; and information about safe sleep environments for infants that is consistent with current information available from the American Academy of Pediatrics. This information shall be discussed with the maternity patient and the other parent of the infant and other relevant family members or caretakers who are present at discharge.

History.

2003, c. 647; 2005, c. 518; 2015, c. 296; 2019, c. 433; 2020, c. 900.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 518 rewrote the section.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 296 inserted “and information about safe sleep environments for infants that is consistent with current information available from the American Academy of Pediatrics” and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 433 inserted “and perinatal anxiety”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 900 substituted “other parent” for “father” in the first and second sentences.

§ 32.1-134.02.
Infants; blood sample provided to parents.

Every hospital providing maternity care shall offer to obtain a sample of blood from an infant born at the hospital and provide that sample to the mother of the infant.

History.

2011, c. 621.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2011, c. 621, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2012.”

§ 32.1-134.1.
When denial, etc., to duly licensed physician of staff membership or professional privileges improper.

It shall be an improper practice for the governing body of a hospital which has twenty-five beds or more and which is required by state law to be licensed to refuse or fail to act within sixty days of a completed application for staff membership or professional privileges or deny or withhold from a duly licensed physician staff membership or professional privileges in such hospital, or to exclude or expel a physician from staff membership in such hospital or curtail, terminate or diminish in any way a physician’s professional privileges in such hospital, without stating in writing the reason or reasons therefor, a copy of which shall be provided to the physician. If the reason or reasons stated are unrelated to standards of patient care, patient welfare, violation of the rules and regulations of the institution or staff, the objectives or efficient operations of the institution, or the character or competency of the applicant, or misconduct in any hospital, it shall be deemed an improper practice.

Any physician licensed in this Commonwealth to practice medicine who is aggrieved by any violation of this section shall have the right to seek an injunction from the circuit court of the city or county in which the hospital alleged to have violated this section is located prohibiting any such further violation. The provisions of this section shall not be deemed to impair or affect any other right or remedy; provided that a violation of this section shall not constitute a violation of the provisions of this article for the purposes of §

32.1-135

.

History.

1979, c. 711.

Law Review.

As to hospital privileges and disciplinary proceedings, see 22 U. Rich. L. Rev. 667 (1988).

§ 32.1-134.2.
Clinical privileges for certain practitioners.

The grant or denial of clinical privileges to licensed podiatrists and certified nurse midwives licensed as nurse practitioners pursuant to § 54.1-2957 by any hospital licensed in this Commonwealth, and the determination by the hospital of the scope of such privileges, shall be based upon such practitioner’s professional license, experience, competence, ability, and judgment, and the reasonable objectives and regulations of the hospital in which such privileges are sought.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-301.1; 1979, c. 40; 1992, c. 452.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 1979 act having been 32-301.1.

Law Review.

For article surveying developments in health care law in Virginia, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 199 (2002).

Research References.

Treatise on Health Care Law (Matthew Bender). Chapter 6 The Medical Staff. § 6.03 Barriers to Medical Staff Membership and Privileges. Hooper, Lundy & Bookman, Inc. General Editors; Lundy, Lead Editor.

Health Care Law: A Practical Guide (Matthew Bender). Chapter 16 The Medical Staff. § 16.04 Criteria for Decisions Regarding Medical Staff Appointments. Capron.

§ 32.1-134.3.
Response to applications for clinical privileges.

Whenever a podiatrist or certified nurse midwife licensed as a nurse practitioner makes application to any hospital for clinical privileges, the hospital shall either approve or disapprove the application within 120 calendar days after it has received all necessary information to make a determination as provided in §

32.1-134.2

from the practitioner.

History.

1981, c. 166; 1992, c. 452.

§ 32.1-134.4.
Right of podiatrists or nurse practitioners to injunction.

Any licensed podiatrist or certified nurse midwife licensed as a nurse practitioner in Virginia who is aggrieved by any violation of §

32.1-134.2

or §

32.1-134.3

shall have the right to seek an injunction from the circuit court of the city or county in which the hospital alleged to have committed the violation is located, prohibiting any further such violation. The provisions of this section shall not be deemed to impair or affect any other right or remedy. A violation of this section, however, shall not constitute a violation of the provisions of this article for the purposes of §

32.1-135

.

History.

1983, c. 259; 1992, c. 452.

§ 32.1-135.
Revocation or suspension of license or certification; restriction or prohibition of new admissions to nursing home.

In accordance with applicable regulations of the Board, the Commissioner (i) may restrict or prohibit new admissions to any nursing home or certified nursing facility, or (ii) may petition the court to impose a civil penalty against any nursing home or certified nursing facility or to appoint a receiver for such nursing home or certified nursing facility, or both, or (iii) may revoke the certification or may revoke or suspend the license of a hospital or nursing home or the certification of any certified nursing facility for violation of any provision of this article or Article 2 (§

32.1-138

et seq.) of this chapter or of any applicable regulation promulgated under this chapter or for permitting, aiding, or abetting the commission of any illegal act in the hospital or nursing home.All appeals from notice of imposition of administrative sanctions shall be received in writing within fifteen days of the date of receipt of such notice. The provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) shall be applicable to such appeals.

If a license or certification is revoked as herein provided, a new license or certification may be issued by the Commissioner after satisfactory evidence is submitted to him that the conditions upon which revocation was based have been corrected and after proper inspection has been made and compliance with all provisions of this article and applicable state and federal law and regulations hereunder has been obtained.

Suspension of a license shall in all cases be for an indefinite time. The Commissioner may completely or partially restore a suspended license or certificate when he determines that the conditions upon which suspension was based have been completely or partially corrected and that the interests of the public will not be jeopardized by resumption of operation. No additional service charges shall be required for restoring such license.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-307; 1979, c. 711; 1989, c. 618.

§ 32.1-135.1.
Certain advertisements prohibited.

No hospital licensed under the provisions of this chapter shall include in any advertisement death rate statistics in such manner as to suggest the relative quality of health or hospital services.

History.

1988, c. 85.

§ 32.1-135.2.
Offer or payment of remuneration in exchange for referral prohibited.

No hospital licensed pursuant to this chapter shall knowingly and willfully offer or pay any remuneration directly or indirectly, in cash or in kind, to induce any practitioner of the healing arts or any clinical psychologist to refer an individual or individuals to such hospital. The Board shall adopt regulations as necessary to carry out the provisions of this section. Such regulations shall be developed in conjunction with the State Board of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services and shall be consistent with regulations adopted by such Board pursuant to §

37.2-420

. Such regulations shall exclude from the definition of “remuneration” any payments, business arrangements, or payment practices not prohibited by 42 U.S.C. § 1320a, as amended, or any regulations promulgated pursuant thereto.

History.

1990, c. 379; 1996, cc. 937, 980; 2009, cc. 813, 840.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and substituted “State Board of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services” for “State Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services Board” in the third sentence.

§ 32.1-136.
Violation; penalties.

Any person owning, establishing, conducting, maintaining, managing or operating a hospital or nursing home which is not licensed as required by this article shall be guilty of a Class 6 felony.

History.

Code 1950, § 32-310; 1962, c. 551; 1979, c. 711.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 6 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on governmental services and social welfare for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 301 (1980).

§ 32.1-137.
Certification of medical care facilities under Title XVIII of Social Security Act.

The Board shall constitute the sole agency of the Commonwealth to enter into contracts with the United States government for the certification of medical care facilities under Title XVIII of the United States Social Security Act and any amendments thereto and with the Virginia Department of Medical Assistance Services for the certification of medical care facilities under Title XIX of the United States Social Security Act and any amendments thereto.

History.

1979, c. 711; 1989, c. 618.

§ 32.1-137.01.
Posting of charity care policies.

Every hospital shall provide written information about the hospital’s charity care policies, including policies related to free and discounted care. Such information shall be posted conspicuously in public areas of the hospital, including admissions or registration areas, emergency departments, and associated waiting rooms. Information regarding specific eligibility criteria and procedures for applying for charity care shall also be (i) provided to a patient at the time of admission or discharge, or at the time services are provided; (ii) included with any billing statements sent to uninsured patients; and (iii) included on any website maintained by the hospital.

Every hospital that is subject to the requirements of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as amended, shall make the information required by subsection A available to persons with limited English proficiency in accordance with the most recent U.S. Department of Health and Human Services’ Guidance to Federal Financial Assistance Recipients Regarding Title VI Prohibition Against National Origin Discrimination Affecting Limited English Proficient Persons.

History.

2009, c. 425; 2022, cc. 678, 679.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 678 and 679 are identical, and added the subsection A designation; in subsection A, deleted “All hospitals” preceding “shall provide”, added “Every hospital”, and inserted “also” in the third sentence; and added subsection B; and made stylistic changes.

§ 32.1-137.02.
Hospital discharge procedures.

Before a hospital discharges a patient, it shall, to the extent allowed pursuant to state and federal law, inform and educate the patient, and his family when it is involved in decision making or ongoing care, about his follow-up care, treatment, and services.

History.

2012, cc. 180, 813.

§ 32.1-137.03.
Discharge planning; designation of individual to provide care.

Every hospital (i) shall provide each patient admitted as an inpatient or his legal guardian the opportunity to designate an individual who will care for or assist the patient in his residence following discharge from the hospital and to whom the hospital shall provide information regarding the patient’s discharge plan and any follow-up care, treatment, and services that the patient may require and (ii) upon admission, shall record in the patient’s medical record the name of the individual designated by the patient, the relationship between the patient and the person, and the person’s telephone number and address. If the patient fails or refuses to designate an individual to receive information regarding his discharge plan and any follow-up care, treatment, and services, the hospital shall record the patient’s failure or refusal in the patient’s medical record. For the purposes of this subsection, “residence” does not include any rehabilitation facility, hospital, nursing home, assisted living facility, or group home.

A patient may change the designated individual at any time prior to the patient’s release, and the hospital shall record in the patient’s medical record the name of the designated individual, the relationship between the patient and the person, and the person’s telephone number and address, within 24 hours of such change.

Prior to discharging a patient who has designated an individual pursuant to subsection A or B, the hospital shall notify the designated individual of the patient’s discharge and shall provide the designated individual with a copy of the patient’s discharge plan and instructions and information regarding any follow-up care, treatment, or services that the designated individual will provide and consult with the designated individual regarding the designated individual’s ability to provide the care, treatment, or services. Such discharge plan shall include (i) the name and contact information of the designated individual; (ii) a description of the follow-up care, treatment, and services that the patient requires; and (iii) information, including contact information, about any health care, long-term care, or other community-based services and supports necessary for the implementation of the patient’s discharge plan. A copy of the discharge plan and any instructions or information provided to the designated individual shall be included in the patient’s medical record.

The hospital shall provide each individual designated pursuant to subsection A or B the opportunity for a demonstration of specific follow-up care tasks that the designated individual will provide to the patient in accordance with the patient’s discharge plan prior to the patient’s discharge, including opportunity for the designated individual to ask questions regarding the performance of follow-up care tasks. Such opportunity shall be provided in a culturally competent manner and in the designated individual’s native language.

Designation of an individual pursuant to subsection A or B shall not create any obligation on the part of the designated individual regarding the provision of any follow-up care, treatment, and services that the patient may require.

Nothing in this section shall create a private right of action against any hospital, its employees, or its contractors.

No hospital or its employees or contractors shall be liable for any civil damages for any injuries resulting from any act of an individual designated pursuant to subsection A or B related to the provision of or failure to provide follow-up care, treatment, or services pursuant to a patient’s discharge plan.

Nothing in this section shall interfere with an individual acting under a valid health care directive.

The Department shall promulgate regulations for the implementation of this section.

History.

2015, cc. 18, 106.

§ 32.1-137.04.
Patient notice of observation or outpatient status.

A hospital shall provide oral and written notice to any patient placed under observation or in any other outpatient status, or to such patient’s authorized representative, informing the patient of his placement in such status if (i) the patient receives onsite services from the hospital and (ii) such onsite services include a hospital bed and meals that are provided in an area of the hospital other than the emergency department. Such oral and written notice shall be provided not later than 36 hours after placement under observation or in any other outpatient status unless the patient has been discharged or has left the hospital prior to the expiration of such 36-hour period.

Such written notice shall be written in clear, understandable language and printed in at least 14-point type. The written notice shall include:

A statement that the patient is not admitted to the hospital as an inpatient but is under observation or in such other outpatient status;

A statement that such observation or other outpatient status may affect the patient’s Medicare, Medicaid, or private health insurance coverage of (i) the current hospital services, including medications and pharmaceutical supplies, and (ii) care at a skilled nursing facility or home or community-based care upon the patient’s discharge from the hospital; and

A statement that the patient should contact the identified hospital representative or his health insurance plan for more information on his observation or other outpatient status and any available recourse.

For any patient placed under observation or in any other outpatient status who is entitled to have payment made under Title XVIII of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 1395 et seq.), a hospital providing written notice and oral explanation of such notice to the patient which satisfies the provisions of 42 U.S.C. § 1395cc(a)(1)(Y) shall be deemed to have satisfied the provisions of this section.

History.

2015, c. 365; 2018, c. 194.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2015 act having been §

32.1-137.03

.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 194, in subdivision B 3, deleted “or the appropriate Center for Medicare & Medicaid Services Beneficiary and Family-Centered Care Quality Improvement Organization” following “insurance plan”; and added subsection C.